New Jersey, session 221, A490.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.     The Chief Administrator of the New Jersey Motor Vehicle Commission shall prohibit a person from obtaining a school bus endorsement for one year, following the date of the last conviction, if that person has accumulated four or more current motor vehicle points as a result of a conviction of one or more violations of the motor vehicle laws of this State or any other jurisdiction for which motor vehicle points are assessed by the chief administrator pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1982, c.43 (C.39:5-30.5). b.    The chief administrator shall suspend for one year, following the date of the last conviction, the school bus endorsement of a person if that person has accumulated four or more current motor vehicle points as a result of a conviction of one or more violations of the motor vehicle laws of this State or any other jurisdiction for which motor vehicle points are assessed by the chief administrator pursuant to section 1 of P.L.1982, c.43 (C.39:5-30.5). c.     The chief administrator shall immediately notify the Commissioner of Education of the suspension of a school bus drivers school bus endorsement pursuant to subsection b. of this section. d.    Upon notification from the chief administrator pursuant to subsection c. of this section, the Commissioner of Education shall immediately notify the board of education or contractor that employs the school bus driver that the school bus endorsement for that school bus driver has been suspended pursuant to subsection b. of this section. e.     A person who has had a school bus endorsement suspended pursuant to this section shall pass a school bus endorsement knowledge test and school bus endorsement skills test prior to being reissued a school bus endorsement following the persons period of suspension. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately but shall apply only to convictions that occur after enactment.